Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB863.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Healthy Workplace Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abusive conduct." As follows:(1) An act or omission intended to inflict and resulting in physical injury or psychological injury, which is not injury compensable under the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, if the injury necessitates treatment by a qualified, licensed 1234567891011121314151617 medical, mental health or rehabilitative professional and is inflicted by means of acts or omissions that a reasonable individual would find abusive, based on the severity, nature and frequency of the conduct, including:(i) Repeated verbal abuse by the use of derogatory remarks, insults and epithets.(ii) Verbal, nonverbal or physical conduct of a threatening, intimidating or humiliating nature.(iii) The sabotage or undermining of an employee's work performance.(2) It shall be considered an aggravating factor if the conduct exploited an employee's known psychological or physical illness or disability.(3) A single act normally shall not constitute abusive conduct, but an especially severe and egregious act may meet this standard."Abusive work environment." An employment condition when an employer or one or more of an employer's employees, acting with intent to cause pain or distress to an employee, subjects an employee to abusive conduct."Adverse employment action." A materially and objectively adverse reduction in terms, conditions or privileges of employment, including:(1) a termination, demotion, unfavorable reassignment or failure to promote;(2) disciplinary action; or(3) reduction in compensation."Employee." A person who performs a service for wages or other remuneration under a contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied, for an employer. The term does not include:20250HB0863PN0900 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) an individual employed in agriculture or in the domestic service of a person;(2) an individual who, as a part of the individual's employment, resides in the personal residence of the employer; or(3) an individual employed by the individual's parents, spouse or child."Employer." An individual, partnership, association, organization, corporation, legal representative, trustee in bankruptcy or receiver employing another person within this Commonwealth. The term includes the Commonwealth and any political subdivision, authority, board or commission of the Commonwealth. The term does not include religious, fraternal, charitable or sectarian corporations or associations, except those corporations or associations supported, in whole or in part, by governmental appropriations."Physical injury." The impairment of an individual's physical health or bodily integrity, as established by competent evidence to the satisfaction of the court."Psychological injury." The impairment of an individual's mental health, as established by competent evidence to the satisfaction of the court.Section 3. Abusive work environment.(a) Prohibition.--An employee may not be subjected to an abusive work environment by an employer or other employee.(b) Retaliation prohibited.--An employer or employee may not retaliate in any manner against an employee who has opposed an unlawful employment practice under this act or who has made a charge, testified, assisted or participated in any manner in an investigation or proceeding under this act, including by:20250HB0863PN0900 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) internal complaints and proceedings;(2) arbitration and mediation proceedings; or(3) legal actions.Section 4. Employer liability.An employer shall be liable for a violation of section 3 committed by an employer's employee. If the alleged violation of section 3 does not include an adverse employment action, it shall be an affirmative defense for an employer only that:(1) the employer exercised reasonable care to promptly prevent and correct any actionable behavior; and(2) the complainant employee unreasonably failed to take advantage of appropriate preventive or corrective opportunities provided by the employer.Section 5. Employee liability.An employee may be individually liable for a violation of section 3. It shall be an affirmative defense for an employee only that the employee committed a violation of section 3 at the direction of the employer, under actual or implied threat of an adverse employment action.Section 6. Affirmative defenses.Any of the following is an affirmative defense to an action under section 3:(1) The complaint is based on an adverse employment action reasonably made for poor performance, misconduct or economic necessity.(2) The complaint is based on a reasonable performance evaluation.(3) The complaint is based on an employer's reasonable investigation about potentially illegal or unethical activity.20250HB0863PN0900 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The complaint is based on an action taken by the employer that it was required by law to take.Section 7. Remedies.(a) Relief.--If a defendant has been found liable for a violation of section 3, the court may enjoin the defendant from engaging in the unlawful employment practice and may order any other relief that is deemed appropriate, including any one or more of the following:(1) Rehiring of the plaintiff, reinstatement to a position and rescission of an adverse employment action.(2) Removal of the offending party from the plaintiff's work environment.(3) Payment of back pay, front pay and medical expenses.(4) Damages for pain and suffering.(5) Damages for emotional distress.(6) Punitive damages.(7) Reasonable attorney fees.(b) Limitation.--If an employer is liable for a violation of section 3 that did not include an adverse employment action, emotional distress damages and punitive damages may be awarded only when the actionable conduct was extreme and outrageous. The limitation does not apply to individually named employee defendants.Section 8. Enforcement.A person aggrieved by a violation of this act may initiate a civil action or other proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction not later than one year from the date of the last alleged violation of section 3.Section 9. Collective bargaining or arbitration agreements.This act shall not prevent, interfere, exempt or supersede 20250HB0863PN0900 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of an employee's collective bargaining or arbitration agreement that provide greater rights and protections than prescribed in this act. This act shall not prevent new provisions of the collective bargaining or arbitration agreement that provide greater rights, remedies and protections from being implemented and applicable to the employee within the collective bargaining or arbitration agreement.Section 10. Effect of other laws.(a) Effect.--Except as provided in subsection (b), provisions of this act may not be deemed to exempt a person from a liability, duty or penalty provided by any other provision of law. The remedies provided under section 7 shall be in addition to remedies provided under any other provision of law.(b) Exception.--Payments of workers' compensation shall be reimbursed from damages paid under this act if an employee receives compensation:(1) for medical costs for the same injury or illness under this act and the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act; or(2) in cash payments under this act and the Workers' Compensation Act for the same period of time not working as a result of the compensable injury or illness or unlawful employment practice.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0863PN0900 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425